Washington statutes.
RCW 19.126.060

Attorney's fees—Costs.

In any action or arbitration brought by a wholesale distributor or a supplier pursuant to this chapter, other than an arbitration to determine the compensation due to a terminated distributor under RCW 19.126.040(4), the prevailing party shall be awarded its reasonable attorney's fees and costs.

[ 2009 c 155 s 4; 1984 c 169 s 6.]